Arkansas, session 2025, HB1424.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-77-154. Treatment of severe obesity.
(a) The Arkansas Medicaid Program shall reimburse for the treatment of
diseases and conditions caused by severe obesity.
(b) The coverage under subsection (a) of this section shall include
coverage for:
(1) Bariatric surgery, as recognized by the American Society for
Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery;
(2) Preoperative care for bariatric surgery; and
(3) Post-operative care for bariatric surgery.
(c) This section does not require the Arkansas Medicaid Program to
provide coverage for injectable drugs to lower glucose levels or any other
drugs prescribed for weight loss.
(d) The Department of Human Services shall apply for any federal
waiver, Medicaid state plan amendments, or other authority necessary to
implement this section.

*ANS042*
04-01-2025 15:04:28 ANS042

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 S4/1/25 HB1424
SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 79, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:

Subchapter 29 — Coverage for Treatment for Severe Obesity

23-79-2901. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Body mass index" means body weight in kilograms divided by
height in meters squared;
(2) "Covered person" means an individual who is entitled to
receive healthcare services under the terms of a health benefit plan;
(3)(A) "Health benefit plan" means an individual, blanket, or
group plan or a policy or contract for healthcare services offered, issued,
renewed, delivered, or extended in this state by a healthcare insurer.
(B) “Health benefit plan” includes indemnity and managed care plans.
(C) “Health benefit plan” does not include:
(i) A plan that provides only dental benefits or eye
and vision care benefits;
(ii) A disability income plan;
(iii) A credit insurance plan;
(iv) Insurance coverage issued as a supplement to
liability insurance;
(v) A medical payment under an automobile or
homeowners insurance plan;
(vi) A health benefit plan provided under Arkansas
Constitution, Article 5, § 32, the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et
seq., or the Public Employee Workers' Compensation Act, § 21-5-601 et seq.;
(vii) A plan that provides only indemnity for
hospital confinement;
(viii) An accident-only plan;
(ix) A specified disease plan;
(x) A long-term-care-only plan; or
(xi) Nonfederal governmental plans as defined in 29
U.S.C. § 1002(32), as it existed on January 1, 2025;
(4)(A) "Healthcare insurer" means an insurance company, hospital
and medical service corporation, or health maintenance organization that
04-01-2025 15:04:28 ANS042

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 S4/1/25 HB1424
issues or delivers health benefit plans in this state and is subject to:
(i) The insurance laws of this state;
(ii) Section 23-75-101 et seq., pertaining to
hospital and medical service corporations; or
(iii) Section 23-76-101 et seq., pertaining to
health maintenance organizations.
(B) "Healthcare insurer" does not include an entity that
provides only dental benefits or eye and vision care benefits;
(5) "Healthcare provider" means a type of provider that renders
healthcare services to patients for compensation including a doctor of
medicine or another licensed healthcare professional acting within the
professional's licensed scope of practice; and
(6) "Severe obesity" means a body mass index equal to or greater
than:
(A) Forty kilograms per meter squared (40 kg/m2); or
(B)(i) Thirty-five kilograms per meter squared (35 kg/m2)
along with an associated comorbidity.
(ii) An associated comorbidity under subdivision
(6)(B)(i) of this section includes without limitation:
(a) Hypertension;
(b) Cardiopulmonary conditions;
(c) Sleep apnea; or
(d) Diabetes.

23-79-2902. Coverage for treatment of diseases and conditions caused
by severe obesity.
(a) On and after January 1, 2026, a health benefit plan that is
offered, issued, renewed, delivered, or extended in this state shall provide
coverage for medically necessary expenses for the treatment of diseases and
conditions caused by severe obesity.
(b) The coverage under subsection (a) of this section shall include
without limitation coverage for:
(1)(A) Bariatric surgery as recognized by the American Society
for Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery.
(B) Bariatric surgery under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this
section shall be limited to the following:
04-01-2025 15:04:28 ANS042

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 S4/1/25 HB1424
(i) Biliopancreatic bypass with duodenal switch;
(ii) Laparoscopic adjustable gastric banding;
(iii) Roux-en-Y procedure; and
(iv) Sleeve gastrectomy;
(2) Revision bariatric surgery when required to manage a
complication resulting from a prior bariatric surgery type as provided in
subdivision (b)(1) of this section that utilizes a different procedure from
those procedures listed in subdivision (b)(1) of this section;
(3) Preoperative care, including without limitation:
(A) Psychological screening and counseling;
(B) Behavior modification counseling;
(C) Nutritional and dietary counseling;
(D) Exercise or physical therapy and counseling; and
(4) Post-operative care, including without limitation:
(A) Post-operative follow-up;
(B) Behavior modification counseling;
(C) Nutritional and dietary counseling;
(D) Exercise or physical therapy and counseling; and
(E) Psychological screening and counseling.
(c) For a covered person to qualify for coverage under this section:
(1) A healthcare provider shall issue a written order that
includes a statement that:
(A) Identifies the body mass index and any associated
comorbid conditions;
(B) Describes the treatment plan for diseases and
conditions caused by severe obesity; and
(C) Attests that the treatment is medically necessary for
the covered person according to the qualifications and treatment standards
established by the American Society for Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery or
the American College of Surgeons;
(2) The covered person shall attest that he or she has:
(A) Participated in a weight loss program;
(B) Received preoperative medical and mental health
evaluations and clearances;
(C) Received preoperative education that addresses the
risks, benefits, realistic expectations, and the need for long-term follow-up
04-01-2025 15:04:28 ANS042

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 S4/1/25 HB1424
and adherence to behavioral modifications; and
(D) Received a copy of the treatment plan that describes
the preoperative needs and postoperative needs of an individual undergoing
bariatric surgery;
(3) In lieu of the list of requirements in subdivision (c)(2) of
this section, a covered person may attest to the completion of a
multidisciplinary surgical preparation program that is also signed by the
healthcare provider; and
(4) Cannot have undergone a bariatric surgery previously, unless
the proposed bariatric surgery is to correct a complication that resulted
from the previous bariatric surgery.

23-79-2903. Limitations.
(a) Before any treatment for diseases and conditions caused by severe
obesity covered under this subchapter begins, a healthcare insurer may
require a covered person to successfully complete a preoperative period of no
more than three (3) months that may include counseling, nutritional
education, and other covered healthcare services to assist in preparation and
evaluation for treatment of diseases and conditions caused by severe obesity.
(b) The coverage for bariatric surgery shall only be for covered
persons who are eighteen (18) years of age or older.
(c) A healthcare insurer may:
(1) Restrict covered healthcare services under this subchapter
to those provided in facilities holding accreditation by the American College
of Surgeons and the American Society for Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery's
Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery Accreditation; and
(2) Require that a covered healthcare service for the treatment
of diseases and conditions caused by severe obesity under this subchapter
receives prior authorization from the healthcare insurer.

23-79-2904. Exclusions.
This subchapter does not require a healthcare insurer to provide
coverage for injectable drugs used to lower glucose levels or any other drugs
prescribed for weight loss.

23-79-2905. Rules.
04-01-2025 15:04:28 ANS042

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 S4/1/25 HB1424
(a) The Insurance Commissioner, in accordance with evidence-based
industry best practices, guidelines, and screening tools as recommended by
the American Society for Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery or another
nationally recognized body as may be designated by the commissioner, shall
evaluate and promulgate rules for additional preoperative conditions that
qualify as associated comorbidities and for coverage requirements.
(b) If the commissioner promulgates rules under subsection (a) of this
section, the rules shall include without limitation medically necessary
expenses for:
(1) Bariatric surgery, revision bariatric surgery, and
reoperative bariatric surgery, as recognized by the American Society for
Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery;
(2) Preoperative care, including without limitation:
(A) Psychological screening and counseling;
(B) Behavior modification counseling;
(C) Nutritional and dietary counseling;
(D) Exercise or physical therapy evaluations, counseling,
and treatment; and
(3) Post-operative care, including without limitation:
(A) Postoperative follow-up;
(B) Behavior modification counseling;
(C) Nutritional and dietary counseling;
(D) Exercise or physical therapy evaluations, counseling,
and treatment; and
(E) Psychological screening and counseling.

/s/L. Johnson









04-01-2025 15:04:28 ANS042